Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-1865] Medical marijuana testing and
research programs; established. (a) To the extent permitted by federal
and state law, and subject to applicable certification by the department of
health, the University of Hawaii may establish medical marijuana testing and
research programs that qualify as commercial enterprises of the university
under section 304A-113 that provide services to state-approved medical
marijuana dispensaries, including assessment of marijuana plant cannabinoid
content and concentration, purity of manufactured marijuana products, or
additional testing requested by the department of health. The university may
assess fees or other charges for services. The fees and charges shall be fair
and equitable with respect to the level and quality of services and
commercially reasonable. In establishing or amending fees or charges for these
services, the university shall be exempt from the requirements of chapter 91.
The fees and charges may be established at an open meeting of the board of
regents subject to chapter 92.

(b) The fees and charges collected pursuant to
subsection (a) shall be deposited into the University of Hawaii commercial
enterprises revolving fund established by section 304A-2251.

(c) To the extent permitted by federal and
state law, and subject to applicable regulations, compliance standards, and
protocols on research activity, the university may conduct research on the
efficacy of medical marijuana use, its health outcomes and social impacts, and
related safety issues.

(d) This section shall be construed to provide
discretionary authority to the university, and nothing in this section shall
require the university to engage in any activity that might jeopardize its
eligibility to receive any form of state or federal assistance or benefit. [L
2016, c 230, §21]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next